Washington statutes.
RCW 16.65.090

Livestock inspection—Consignor's fee—Inspection fee—Call out fee. (Effective until July 1, 2026.)

When livestock inspection is required the licensee shall collect from the consignor and pay to the department an inspection fee, as provided by law, for each animal inspected. However, if in any one sale day the total fees collected for inspection do not exceed $150, then the licensee shall pay $150 for the inspection services. The licensee must pay a call out fee of $20 to the department for each day and for each livestock inspector who performs inspections at a public livestock market. No call out fee is charged for an inspection done by a certified veterinarian or field livestock inspector.

[ 2023 c 46 s 6; 2019 c 92 s 11; 2003 c 326 s 71; 1997 c 356 s 11; 1997 c 356 s 10; 1994 c 46 s 22; 1994 c 46 s 13; 1993 c 354 s 2; 1983 c 298 s 8; 1971 ex.s. c 192 s 3; 1959 c 107 s 9.]

NOTES:

Expiration date—2023 c 46 ss 1, 3, 5, and 6: See note following RCW 16.57.015.

Expiration date—2023 c 46; 2022 c 158; 2019 c 92 ss 1, 5, 8, and 11: See note following RCW 16.57.015.

Effective dates—2003 c 326: See RCW 16.57.902.

Effective dates—1997 c 356: See note following RCW 16.57.220.

Effective date—1994 c 46 ss 21-25: "Sections 21 through 25 of this act shall take effect July 1, 1997." [ 1994 c 46 s 29.]

Effective date—1994 c 46: See note following RCW 15.58.070.

Prior legislative approval—1994 c 46: See note following RCW 16.65.030.

PDFRCW 16.65.090

Livestock inspection—Consignor's fee—Inspection fee. (Effective July 1, 2026.)

The director shall provide for livestock inspection. When livestock inspection is required the licensee shall collect from the consignor and pay to the department an inspection fee, as provided by law, for each animal inspected. However, if in any one sale day the total fees collected for inspection do not exceed one hundred dollars, then the licensee shall pay one hundred dollars for the inspection services.

[ 2003 c 326 s 71; 1997 c 356 s 11; 1997 c 356 s 10; 1994 c 46 s 22; 1994 c 46 s 13; 1993 c 354 s 2; 1983 c 298 s 8; 1971 ex.s. c 192 s 3; 1959 c 107 s 9.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2003 c 326: See RCW 16.57.902.

Effective dates—1997 c 356: See note following RCW 16.57.220.

Effective date—1994 c 46 ss 21-25: "Sections 21 through 25 of this act shall take effect July 1, 1997." [ 1994 c 46 s 29.]

Effective date—1994 c 46: See note following RCW 15.58.070.

Prior legislative approval—1994 c 46: See note following RCW 16.65.030.